Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2884.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of veterans' services; Black Mesa Chapter; veterans center The sum of $2,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of veterans' services to distribute to the Black Mesa Chapter of the Navajo Nation to survey, design and construct a veterans center for the Black Mesa Chapter.